nl: Waterski vin type: Verstelbaar; Dubbel; Vast; Verwijderbaar; Overige
fr: Type d’aileron de ski nautique: Réglable; Double; Fixe; Amovible; Autre
en: Water ski fin type: Adjustable; Dual; Fixed; Removable; Other
el: Τύπος πτερυγίου θαλάσσιου σκι: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Διπλό; Σταθερό; Αφαιρούμενο; Άλλο
pt-BR: Esqui aquático tipo de quilha: Ajustável; Duplo; Fixo; Removível; Outros
sv: Typ av fena för vattenskidor: Justerbar; Dubbel; Fast; Avtagbar; Övrigt
zh-CN: 滑水橇鳍片类型: 可调式; 双鳍; 固定式; 可拆卸式; 其他
vi: kiểu vây trượt nước: Có thể điều chỉnh; Kép; Cố định; Có thể tháo rời; Khác
pl: Typ statecznika narty wodnej: Regulowany; Podwójny; Stały; Wyjmowany; Inne
hu: Vízisí-uszony típusa: Állítható; Dupla; Rögzített; Levehető; Egyéb
ru: Тип киля водных лыж: Регулируемый; Двойной; Фиксированный; Съемный; Другое
zh-TW: 滑水板鰭片類型: 可調式; 雙尾鰭; 固定式; 可拆式; 其他
da: Finnetype for vandski: Justerbar; Dobbelt; Fast; Aftagelig; Andet
es: Tipo de aleta del esquí acuático: Ajustable; Doble; Fijo; Extraíble; Otro
th: ครีบสกีน้ำ: ปรับได้; คู่; ตายตัว; ถอดได้; อื่นๆ
ko: 수상스키 핀 유형: 조절형; 듀얼; 고정형; 탈착형; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de quilha do esqui aquático: Ajustável; Duplo; Fixo; Amovível; Outro
tr: Su kayağı kanatçık tipi: Ayarlanabilir; Çift; Sabit; Çıkarılabilir; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ plutiev na vodné lyže: Nastaviteľná; Dvojitá; Pevná; Odnímateľná; Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta smernika vodne smučke: Nastavljiv; Dvojni; Fiksni; Odstranljiv; Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta peraja za skijanje na vodi: Prilagodljivo; Dvostruko; Fiksno; Uklonjivo; Ostalo
cs: Typ ploutve vodních lyží: Nastavitelná; Dvojitá; Pevná; Odnímatelná; Jiná
it: Tipo di pinna da sci nautico: Regolabile; Doppia; Fissa; Rimovibile; Altro
nb: Type vannskifinne: Justerbar; Dobbel; Fast; Avtakbar; Annet
ro-RO: Tipul aripioarei pentru schi nautic: Reglabil; Dublu; Fix; Detașabil; Altele
lt-LT: Vandens slidžių pelekų tipas: Reguliuojamas; Dvigubas; Fiksuotas; Nuimamas; Kita
ja: 水上スキーフィンタイプ: 調整可能; デュアル; 固定式; 取り外し可能; その他
de: Art der Wasserskifinne: Verstellbar; Doppel; Fest; Abnehmbar; Sonstige
fi: Vesisuksien evätyyppi: Säädettävä; Kaksoisevä; Kiinteä; Irrotettava; Muu
bg-BG: Вид перка за водни ски: Регулируема; Двойна; Фиксирана; Подвижна; Други